District of Columbia statutes.
8-2101.02

Transfer of functions and duties from the Department of Public Works.

All the functions, duties, property, records, and personnel associated with the control and elimination of rodents now under the authority of the Department of Public Works are transferred to the Bureau.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 903, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 902 to 908 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 8-2101.01.